Hawaii statutes.
§39A-206 Refunding special purpose revenue
bonds. The legislature, by act enacted by an affirmative vote of
two-thirds of the members to which each house is entitled, may authorize the
issuance of refunding special purpose revenue bonds for the purpose of
refunding any special purpose revenue bonds then outstanding and issued under
this part, whether or not such outstanding special purpose revenue bonds have
matured or are then subject to redemption. The legislature may provide, by act
enacted by an affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members to which each house
is entitled, for the issuance of a single issue of special purpose revenue
bonds for the combined purposes of:

(1) Financing the cost of a project or improvement or
expansion thereof; and

(2) Refunding special purpose revenue bonds that
shall theretofore have been issued under this part and shall then be
outstanding, whether or not such outstanding special purpose revenue bonds have
matured or are then subject to redemption.

Nothing in this section shall require or be deemed
to require the department to elect to redeem or prepay special purpose revenue
bonds being refunded, or to redeem or prepay special purpose revenue bonds
being refunded that were issued in the form customarily known as term bonds in
accordance with any sinking fund installment schedule specified in any law
authorizing the issuance thereof, or, in the event the department elects to
redeem or prepay any such bonds, to redeem or prepay as of any particular date
or dates. The issuance of such special purpose revenue bonds, the maturities
and other details thereof, the rights and remedies of the holders thereof, and
the rights, powers, privileges, duties, and obligations of the department with
respect to the bonds, shall be governed by the foregoing provisions of this
part insofar as the provisions may be applicable. [L 1981, c 151, pt of §2; am
L 2012, c 242, §12]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next